Wisconsin, session 2025, SB861.
do enact as follows:SB861,11Section 1. 20.566 (8) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,2,6220.566 (8) (c) Vendor fees; general purpose revenue. The amounts in the 3schedule to pay vendors for on-line and instant ticket break open game services and 4supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 (1s), instant game services and supplies, as defined 5in s. 565.01 (3h), and lotto game services and supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 (3w), 6provided by the vendors under contract under s. 565.25 (2) (a).SB861,27Section 2. 20.566 (8) (v) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,2,12820.566 (8) (v) Vendor fees. From the lottery fund, a sum sufficient to pay 9vendors for on-line and instant ticket break open game services and supplies, as 10defined in s. 565.01 (1s), instant game services and supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 11(3h), and lotto game services and supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 (3w), provided by 12the vendors under contract under s. 565.25 (2) (a).SB861,313Section 3. 25.75 (1) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,3,21425.75 (1) (c) 3. Amounts for other expenses, including compensation paid to 15retailers under s. 565.10 (14) and amounts paid to vendors for on-line break open 16game services and supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 (1s), instant game services and 17supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 (3h), and lotto game services and supplies, as 1defined in s. 565.01 (3w), provided by the vendors under contract under s. 565.25 (2) 2(a).SB861,43Section 4. 25.75 (3) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,3,7425.75 (3) (b) 3. Payments to vendors for on-line break open game services and 5supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 (1s), instant game services and supplies, as defined 6in s. 565.01 (3h), and lotto game services and supplies, as defined in s. 565.01 (3w), 7provided by the vendors under contract under s. 565.25 (2) (a) shall be included.SB861,58Section 5. 565.01 (1r) of the statutes is created to read:SB861,3,139565.01 (1r) “Break open game” means a game of chance, as described under 10sub. (6m) (a) 1., commonly known as a pull-tab game, that is played, revealed, or 11displayed on a preprinted digital or physical ticket and that is identified as a “break 12open game” in the lottery division of the department’s published features and 13procedures for the game of chance.SB861,614Section 6. 565.01 (1s) of the statutes is created to read:SB861,3,2015565.01 (1s) “Break open game services and supplies” means services and 16supplies specifically associated with break open games, including digital and 17physical tickets, computerized transaction processing equipment, computerized 18retailer vending terminals, and technologies necessary to maximize the state 19lottery revenues related to break open games and minimize the state lottery’s 20operating costs related to break open games.SB861,721Section 7. 565.01 (3g) of the statutes is created to read:SB861,4,222565.01 (3g) “Instant game” means a game of chance, as described under sub. 23(6m) (a) 1., commonly known as a scratch-off game, that is played, revealed, or 24displayed on a preprinted digital or physical ticket and that is identified as an 1“instant game” in the lottery division of the department’s published features and 2procedures for the game of chance.SB861,83Section 8. 565.01 (3h) of the statutes is created to read:SB861,4,94565.01 (3h) “Instant game services and supplies” means services and 5supplies specifically associated with instant games, including digital and physical 6tickets, computerized transaction processing equipment, computerized retailer 7vending terminals, and technologies necessary to maximize the state lottery 8revenues related to instant games and minimize the state lottery’s operating costs 9related to instant games.SB861,910Section 9. 565.01 (3m) of the statutes is repealed.SB861,1011Section 10. 565.01 (3v) of the statutes is created to read:SB861,4,1512565.01 (3v) “Lotto game” means a game of chance, as described under sub. 13(6m) (a) 2., that is played, revealed, or displayed on a preprinted digital or physical 14ticket and that is identified as a “lotto game” in the lottery division of the 15department’s published features and procedures for the game of chance.SB861,1116Section 11. 565.01 (3w) of the statutes is created to read:SB861,4,2217565.01 (3w) “Lotto game services and supplies” means services and supplies 18specifically associated with lotto games, including digital and physical tickets, 19computerized transaction processing equipment, computerized retailer vending 20terminals, and technologies necessary to maximize the state lottery revenues 21related to lotto games and minimize the state lottery’s operating costs related to 22lotto games.SB861,1223Section 12. 565.01 (4g) of the statutes is repealed.SB861,1324Section 13. 565.02 (3) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,5,21565.02 (3) (i) Providing for terms of lottery retailer contracts for periods that 2are shorter than 3 5 years.SB861,143Section 14. 565.02 (3) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,5,64565.02 (3) (j) Requiring retailers to display a sign provided by the department 5under s. 565.27 (5) that provides notice that the top prizes in a scratch-off an 6instant game have been claimed.SB861,157Section 15. 565.02 (4) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,5,158565.02 (4) (g) Establishing a program to provide for additional compensation, 9above the compensation provided under s. 565.10 (14) (b) 1. or, 2., or 3., to be paid to 10retailers who meet certain performance goals identified by the department. Under 11this program, the total compensation provided to retailers may not exceed 1.0 12percent of the gross revenues from the sale of lottery tickets and lottery shares lotto 13game lottery tickets and lottery shares, 1.0 percent of the gross revenues from the 14sale of instant game lottery tickets and lottery shares, and 2.0 percent of the gross 15revenues from the sale of break open game lottery tickets and lottery shares.SB861,1616Section 16. 565.10 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,6,417565.10 (3) (b) No lottery retailer contract may be entered into with a person 18who has been finally adjudged to be delinquent in the payment of taxes under ch. 1971, 72, 76, 77, 78, or 139, who has been found delinquent in the payment of 20contributions to the unemployment reserve fund under s. 108.16 in a proceeding 21under s. 108.10, or who owes a payment to the uninsured employers fund under s. 22102.82 or 102.85 (4) or to the work injury supplemental benefit fund under s. 102.49 23(5) (a), 102.59 (2), or 102.60 (5) (b) if the person remains liable for those taxes, 24contributions, or payments at the time the person seeks to enter into the lottery 1retailer contract. This paragraph does not apply to a retailer if, through a payment 2plan approved by the the department of workforce development or the division in 3the department of revenue responsible for delinquent tax payments, the retailer is 4paying off an amount described under this paragraph.SB861,175Section 17. 565.10 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,6,86565.10 (7) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), a lottery retailer contract shall be 7for a period of 3 5 years and shall specify whether the retailer is authorized to 8conduct lottery ticket sales on a year-round, seasonal or temporary basis.SB861,189Section 18. 565.10 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,6,1210565.10 (7) (b) The administrator may, under rules promulgated by the 11department, contract for a period that is shorter than 3 5 years in order to stagger 12lottery retailer contract expiration dates throughout a 3-year 5-year period.SB861,1913Section 19. 565.10 (14) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,6,1714565.10 (14) (b) 1. The basic compensation to be paid to a retailer for the sale of 15a lotto game lottery ticket or lottery share described under s. 565.01 (6m) (a) 2. is 165.5 percent of the retail price of lotto game lottery tickets or lottery shares sold by 17the retailer.SB861,2018Section 20. 565.10 (14) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB861,6,2219565.10 (14) (b) 2. The basic compensation to be paid to a retailer for the sale of 20a an instant game lottery ticket or lottery share described under s. 565.01 (6m) (a) 211. is 6.25 percent of the retail price of instant game lottery tickets or lottery shares 22sold by the retailer.SB861,2123Section 21. 565.10 (14) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB861,7,224565.10 (14) (b) 3. The basic compensation to be paid to a retailer for the sale of 1a break open game lottery ticket or lottery share is 15 percent of the retail price of 2break open game lottery tickets or lottery shares sold by the retailer. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb861 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb861 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB861 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB861 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB861: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting